Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.037

Petition—Notice of certification.

The county auditor who certifies the sufficiency of the petition shall notify the person or persons who submitted the petition of its sufficiency within five days of when the determination of sufficiency is made. Notice shall be by certified mail and may additionally be made by telephone. If a boundary review board or boards exists in the county or counties in which the proposed city or town is located, the petitioners shall file notice of the proposed incorporation with the boundary review board or boards.

[ 1986 c 234 s 6.]